District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.04

Board of Nursing.

(a)

There is established a Board of Nursing to consist of 11 members appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council.

(b)

(1)

The Board shall regulate the practice of advanced practice registered nursing, registered nursing, practical nursing, and nursing assistive personnel. Advanced practice registered nursing shall include the categories of nurse midwife, nurse anesthetist, nurse-practitioner, and clinical nurse specialist.

(2)

The Board shall recommend for promulgation by the Mayor curricula and standards required for the approval of nursing schools and nursing programs in the District of Columbia. At a minimum, the Board shall require that nursing schools and nursing programs be accredited by a Board-recognized national nursing accrediting agency. The Board may also recommend to the Mayor rules governing the procedures for withdrawing approval of nursing schools and nursing programs.

(c)

Of the members of the Board, 7 shall be registered nurses licensed and practicing in the District; 2 shall be practical nurses licensed in the District; and 2 shall be consumer members.

(d)

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, members of the Board shall be appointed for terms of 3 years.

(e)

Of the members initially appointed under this section, 3 shall be appointed for a term of 1 year, 4 shall be appointed for a term of 2 years, and 4 shall be appointed for a term of 3 years. The terms of the members first appointed shall begin on the date that a majority of the first members are sworn in, which shall become the anniversary date for all subsequent appointments.

(f)

The Mayor shall appoint an executive director, who shall be a full-time employee of the District, to administer and implement the orders of the Board in accordance with this subchapter and rules and regulations issued pursuant to this subchapter.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 204, 33 DCR 729
Oct. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 7-31, § 3(c), 34 DCR 3789
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(e), 42 DCR 457
July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-18, § 2(c), 56 DCR 3624

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-523.01, § 7-1301.03, and § 44-1051.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3302.4.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-18 rewrote subsec. (b); and added subsec. (f).

Editor's Notes

Establishment of Nursing Shortage Study Commission: Section 2 of D.C. Law 7-35 provided for the establishment of the District of Columbia Nursing Shortage Study Commission, including the appointment, membership, duration, focus of study, reports, reimbursement, office space and support personnel.